Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-14,103
Failure to enforce rights; effect on subsequent enforcement.

Failure to enforce any portion of the rental agreement or to enforce any violation of the rules or regulations shall not constitute a waiver of the right to enforce the agreement against a subsequent violation.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 54.